Utah statutes.
72-4-213.   Pioneer Trail Memorial Highway.

(1)  There is established the Pioneer Trail Memorial Highway comprising the existing highways beginning at the junction of Route 84 and Route 65 and proceeding southwesterly on Route 65 to the junction of Route 65 and Emigration Canyon Road; then beginning again in Salt Lake City at the junction of Route 186 and Sunnyside Avenue and proceeding westerly on Route 186 to Interstate Route 15.

(2)  In addition to other official designations, the Department of Transportation shall designate the portions of the highway identified in Subsection (1) as the Pioneer Trail Memorial Highway on future state highway maps.



Enacted by Chapter 301, 2010 General Session

